Hawaii statutes.
§440-9 Jurisdiction of commission.
(a) The commission is vested with the sole jurisdiction, direction,
management, and control over all professional and amateur boxing, to be
conducted, held, or given within the State. No professional or amateur boxing
contest shall be conducted, held, or given within the State except in
accordance with this chapter and the rules adopted by the commission pursuant
thereto.

(b) No professional boxing contest shall take
place unless the commission has approved all proposed bouts. In addition, the
commission shall not allow any professional boxing contest unless:

(1) The contestants use gloves not less than six
ounces in weight;

(2) The contest consists of not more than twelve
rounds of a duration of not more than three minutes each with an interval of
one minute between each round and the succeeding round;

(3) Each contestant is at least eighteen years of
age;

(4) One hour prior to the contest each contestant is
examined by a licensed physician who shall certify in writing to the referee of
the contest that the contestant is physically fit to engage therein;

(5) The promoter has complied with sections 440-10
and 440-11; and

(6) All participants have complied with the
requirements provided in this chapter and rules adopted in accordance with
chapter 91. [L 1929, c 216, §10; RL 1935, §6997; RL 1945, §7558; am L 1949, c
264, §4; am L 1951, c 307, §5; RL 1955, §165-9; HRS §440-9; am L 1979, c 14,
§1; am L 1983, c 241, §7; am L 1986, c 135, §6; am L 2004, c 135, §8]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next